Utah statutes.
70A-2-509.   Risk of loss in the absence of breach.
(1)  Where the contract requires or authorizes the seller to ship the goods by
carrier:
(a)  if it does not require him to deliver them at a particular destination,
the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are duly delivered to the
carrier even though the shipment is under reservation as provided in Section
70A-2-505; but
(b)  if it does require him to deliver them at a particular destination and
the goods are there duly tendered while in the possession of the carrier, the
risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are there duly so tendered as
to enable the buyer to take delivery.
(2)  Where the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being moved,
the risk of loss passes to the buyer:
(a)  on his receipt of possession or control of a negotiable document of title
covering the goods;
(b)  on acknowledgment by the bailee of the buyer's right to possession of the
goods; or
(c)  after his receipt of possession or control of a nonnegotiable document of
title or other direction to deliver in a record, as provided in Subsection
70A-2-503(4)(b).
(3)  In any case not within Subsection (1) or (2), the risk of loss passes to
the buyer on his receipt of the goods if the seller is a merchant; otherwise
the risk passes to the buyer on tender of delivery.
(4)  The provisions of this section are subject to contrary agreement of the
parties and to the provisions of this chapter on sale on approval as provided
in Section 70A-2-327 and on effect of breach on risk of loss as provided in
Section 70A-2-510.
